Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-694
Conviction; credibility as a witness.

The conviction of a person upon a charge of violating any provision of the Nebraska Rules of the Road or other traffic regulation which is less than a felony shall not affect or impair the credibility of such person as a witness in any civil or criminal proceeding.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 119;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,119;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 190.